North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 2. Municipal Campaign Reporting.

§ 163-278.40.
Definitions.

When used in this Part, words and phrases have the same meaning as in

G.S. 163-278.6

, except that:

The term “board” means the county board of elections; [and]

The term “city” means any incorporated city, town, or village.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 1997-515, s. 4(d); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Town of Chapel Hill: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1023, s. 2.

§ 163-278.40A.
Organizational report.

Each candidate and political committee in a city election shall appoint a treasurer and, under verification, report the name and address of the treasurer to the board. A candidate may appoint himself or any other individual, including any relative except
his spouse, as his treasurer. If the candidate fails to designate a treasurer, the candidate shall be deemed to have appointed himself as treasurer. A candidate or political committee may remove his or its treasurer.

The organizational report shall state the bank account and number of such campaign fund. Each report required by this Part shall reflect all contributions, expenditures and loans made in behalf of a candidate. The organizational report shall be filed
with the county board of elections within 10 days after the candidate files a notice of candidacy with the county board of elections, or within 10 days following the organization of the political committee, whichever occurs first.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Cross References.

For definition of “treasurer,” see

G.S. 163-278.6

.

§ 163-278.40B.
Campaign report; partisan election.

In any city election conducted on a partisan basis in accordance with G.S. 163-279(a)(2) and

G.S. 163-291

, the following reports shall be filed in addition to the organizational report:

Thirty-five-day Report. — The treasurer shall file a report with the board 35 days before the primary.

Pre-primary Report. — The treasurer shall file a report with the board no later than the tenth day preceding each primary election.

Pre-election Report. — The treasurer shall file a report 10 days before the election, unless a second primary is held and the candidate appeared on the ballot in the second primary, in which case the report shall be filed 10 days before the second primary.

Semiannual Reports. — If contributions are received or expenditures made during any part of a calendar year, for which no reports are otherwise required by this section, any and all those contributions and expenditures shall be reported on semiannual
reports due on the last Friday in July, covering the period through June 30, and due on the last Friday in January, covering the period through December 31 of the previous year.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 1985, c. 164, s. 2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 7; 2001-419, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.40C.
Campaign report; nonpartisan election and runoff.

If any city election conducted under the nonpartisan election and runoff basis in accordance with G.S. 163-279(a)(4) and [G.S.] 163-293, the following reports shall be filed in addition to the organizational report:

Thirty-five-day Report. — The treasurer shall file a report with the board 35 days before the election.

Pre-election Report. — The treasurer shall file a report with the board 10 days before the election.

Pre-runoff Report. — The treasurer shall file a report with the board 10 days before the runoff if the candidate is in a runoff.

Semiannual Reports. — If contributions are received or expenditures made during any part of a calendar year, for which no reports are otherwise required by this section, any and all those contributions and expenditures shall be reported on semiannual
reports due on the last Friday in July, covering the period through June 30, and due on the last Friday in January, covering the period through December 31 of the previous year.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 1985, c. 164, s. 3; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 8; 2001-419, s. 4; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.40D.
Campaign report; nonpartisan primary and elections.

In any city election conducted under the nonpartisan primary method in accordance with G.S. 163-279(a)(3) and [G.S.] 163-294, the following reports shall be filed in addition to the organizational report:

Thirty-five-day Report. — The treasurer shall file a report with the board 35 days before the primary if the candidate is in a primary or the same length of time before the election if the candidate is not in a primary.

Pre-primary and Pre-election Reports. — The treasurer shall file a report 10 days before the primary if the candidate is in a primary and 10 days before the election.

Semiannual Reports. — If contributions are received or expenditures made during any part of a calendar year, for which no reports are otherwise required by this section, any and all those contributions and expenditures shall be reported on semiannual
reports due on the last Friday in July, covering the period through June 30, and due on the last Friday in January, covering the period through December 31 of the previous year.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 1985, c. 164, s. 4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 9; 2001-419, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.40E.
Campaign report; nonpartisan plurality.

In any city election conducted under the nonpartisan plurality method under G.S. 163-279(a)(1) and [G.S.] 163-292, the following reports shall be filed in addition to the organizational report:

Thirty-five-day Report. — The treasurer shall file a report with the board 35 days before the election.

Pre-election Report. — The treasurer shall file a report 10 days before the election.

Semiannual Reports. — If contributions are received or expenditures made during any part of a calendar year, for which no reports are otherwise required by this section, any and all those contributions and expenditures shall be reported on semiannual
reports due on the last Friday in July, covering the period through June 30, and due on the last Friday in January, covering the period through December 31 of the previous year.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 1985, c. 164, s. 5; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 10; 2001-419, s. 6; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.40F.
Form of report.

Forms of reports under this Part shall be prescribed by the board.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.40G.
Content.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part, each report shall be current within seven days prior to the date the report is due and shall list all contributions received and expenditures made which have not been previously reported.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.40H.
Notice of reports due.

The director of the board shall advise, or cause to be advised, no less than five days nor more than 15 days before each report is due each candidate or treasurer whose organizational report has been filed under

G.S. 163-278.40

A of the specific date each report is due. The director shall immediately notify any individual, candidate, treasurer, or political committee, to file a statement under this Part if:

It appears that the individual, candidate, treasurer, or political committee has failed to file a statement as required by law or that a statement filed does not conform to this Part; or

A written complaint is filed under oath with the State Board of Elections by any registered voter of this State alleging that a statement filed with the board does not conform to this Part or to the truth or that an individual, candidate, treasurer, or
political committee has failed to file a statement required by this Part.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 2014-111, s. 9; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.40I.
Part 1 to apply.

Except as provided in this Part or in G.S. 163-278.9(c), the provisions of Part 1 shall apply to municipal elections covered by this Part.

G.S. 63-278.7, 163-278.9(a) and (b), 163-278.22(1) and (9), the first paragraph of 163-278.23, 163-278.24, 163-278.26, and 163-278.26 shall not apply to this Part.

History.
1981, c. 837, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.40J.
Other committees report by municipal schedule.

A candidate or political committee that appoints a treasurer under

G.S. 163-278.7

shall make reports according to the schedule under this Part if it makes contributions or expenditures concerning municipal elections.

History.
2008-150, s. 9(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).